Illinois, session 104th, SB2306.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Finance Authority Act is amended 5by changing Sections 801-10, 801-40, and 850-10 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3501/801-10)7    Sec. 801-10. Definitions. The following terms, whenever 8used or referred to in this Act, shall have the following 9meanings, except in such instances where the context may 10clearly indicate otherwise:11    (a) The term "Authority" means the Illinois Finance 12Authority created by this Act.13    (b) The term "project" means an industrial project, clean 14energy project, conservation project, housing project, public 15purpose project, higher education project, health facility 16project, cultural institution project, municipal bond program 17project, PACE Project, agricultural facility or agribusiness, 18and "project" may include any combination of one or more of the 19foregoing undertaken jointly by any person with one or more 20other persons.21    (c) The term "public purpose project" means (i) any 22project or facility, including without limitation land, 23buildings, structures, machinery, equipment and all other real   SB2306 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1and personal property, which is authorized or required by law 2to be acquired, constructed, improved, rehabilitated, 3reconstructed, replaced or maintained by any unit of 4government or any other lawful public purpose, including 5provision of working capital, which is authorized or required 6by law to be undertaken by any unit of government or (ii) costs 7incurred and other expenditures, including expenditures for 8management, investment, or working capital costs, incurred in 9connection with the reform, consolidation, or implementation 10of the transition process as described in Articles 22B and 22C 11of the Illinois Pension Code. 12    (d) The term "industrial project" means the acquisition, 13construction, refurbishment, creation, development or 14redevelopment of any facility, equipment, machinery, real 15property or personal property for use by any instrumentality 16of the State or its political subdivisions, for use by any 17person or institution, public or private, for profit or not 18for profit, or for use in any trade or business, including, but 19not limited to, any industrial, manufacturing, clean energy, 20or commercial enterprise that is located within or outside the 21State, provided that, with respect to a project involving 22property located outside the State, the property must be 23owned, operated, leased or managed by an entity located within 24the State or an entity affiliated with an entity located 25within the State, and which is (1) a capital project or clean 26energy project, including, but not limited to: (i) land and   SB2306 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1any rights therein, one or more buildings, structures or other 2improvements, machinery and equipment, whether now existing or 3hereafter acquired, and whether or not located on the same 4site or sites; (ii) all appurtenances and facilities 5incidental to the foregoing, including, but not limited to, 6utilities, access roads, railroad sidings, track, docking and 7similar facilities, parking facilities, dockage, wharfage, 8railroad roadbed, track, trestle, depot, terminal, switching 9and signaling or related equipment, site preparation and 10landscaping; and (iii) all non-capital costs and expenses 11relating thereto or (2) any addition to, renovation, 12rehabilitation or improvement of a capital project or a clean 13energy project, or (3) any activity or undertaking within or 14outside the State, provided that, with respect to a project 15involving property located outside the State, the property 16must be owned, operated, leased or managed by an entity 17located within the State or an entity affiliated with an 18entity located within the State, which the Authority 19determines will aid, assist or encourage economic growth, 20development or redevelopment within the State or any area 21thereof, will promote the expansion, retention or 22diversification of employment opportunities within the State 23or any area thereof or will aid in stabilizing or developing 24any industry or economic sector of the State economy. The term 25"industrial project" also means the production of motion 26pictures.  SB2306 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    (e) The term "bond" or "bonds" shall include bonds, notes 2(including bond, grant or revenue anticipation notes), 3certificates and/or other evidences of indebtedness 4representing an obligation to pay money, including refunding 5bonds.6    (f) The terms "lease agreement" and "loan agreement" shall 7mean: (i) an agreement whereby a project acquired by the 8Authority by purchase, gift or lease is leased to any person, 9corporation or unit of local government which will use or 10cause the project to be used as a project as heretofore defined 11upon terms providing for lease rental payments at least 12sufficient to pay when due all principal of, interest and 13premium, if any, on any bonds of the Authority issued with 14respect to such project, providing for the maintenance, 15insuring and operation of the project on terms satisfactory to 16the Authority, providing for disposition of the project upon 17termination of the lease term, including purchase options or 18abandonment of the premises, and such other terms as may be 19deemed desirable by the Authority, or (ii) any agreement 20pursuant to which the Authority agrees to loan the proceeds of 21its bonds issued with respect to a project or other funds of 22the Authority to any person which will use or cause the project 23to be used as a project as heretofore defined or for any other 24lawful purpose upon terms providing for loan repayment 25installments at least sufficient to pay when due all principal 26of, interest and premium, if any, on any bonds of the   SB2306 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1Authority, if any, issued with respect to the project or for 2any other lawful purpose, and providing for maintenance, 3insurance and other matters as may be deemed desirable by the 4Authority, or (iii) any financing or refinancing agreement 5entered into by the Authority under subsection (aa) of Section 6801-40.7    (g) The term "financial aid" means the expenditure of 8Authority funds or funds provided by the Authority through the 9issuance of its bonds, notes or other evidences of 10indebtedness or from other sources for the development, 11construction, acquisition or improvement of a project.12    (h) The term "person" means an individual, corporation, 13unit of government, business trust, estate, trust, partnership 14or association, 2 or more persons having a joint or common 15interest, or any other legal entity.16    (i) The term "unit of government" means the federal 17government, the State or unit of local government, a school 18district, or any agency or instrumentality, office, officer, 19department, division, bureau, commission, college or 20university thereof.21    (j) The term "health facility" means: (a) any public or 22private institution, place, building, or agency required to be 23licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act; (b) any public or 24private institution, place, building, or agency required to be 25licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 26Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community   SB2306 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1Care Act, or the MC/DD Act; (c) any public or licensed private 2hospital as defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 3Disabilities Code; (d) any such facility exempted from such 4licensure when the Director of Public Health attests that such 5exempted facility meets the statutory definition of a facility 6subject to licensure; (e) any other public or private health 7service institution, place, building, or agency which the 8Director of Public Health attests is subject to certification 9by the Secretary, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services 10under the Social Security Act, as now or hereafter amended, or 11which the Director of Public Health attests is subject to 12standard-setting by a recognized public or voluntary 13accrediting or standard-setting agency; (f) any public or 14private institution, place, building or agency engaged in 15providing one or more supporting services to a health 16facility; (g) any public or private institution, place, 17building or agency engaged in providing training in the 18healing arts, including, but not limited to, schools of 19medicine, dentistry, osteopathy, optometry, podiatry, pharmacy 20or nursing, schools for the training of x-ray, laboratory or 21other health care technicians and schools for the training of 22para-professionals in the health care field; (h) any public or 23private congregate, life or extended care or elderly housing 24facility or any public or private home for the aged or infirm, 25including, without limitation, any Facility as defined in the 26Life Care Facilities Act; (i) any public or private mental,   SB2306 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1emotional or physical rehabilitation facility or any public or 2private educational, counseling, or rehabilitation facility or 3home, for those persons with a developmental disability, those 4who are physically ill or disabled, the emotionally disturbed, 5those persons with a mental illness or persons with learning 6or similar disabilities or problems; (j) any public or private 7alcohol, drug or substance abuse diagnosis, counseling 8treatment or rehabilitation facility, (k) any public or 9private institution, place, building or agency licensed by the 10Department of Children and Family Services or which is not so 11licensed but which the Director of Children and Family 12Services attests provides child care, child welfare or other 13services of the type provided by facilities subject to such 14licensure; (l) any public or private adoption agency or 15facility; and (m) any public or private blood bank or blood 16center. "Health facility" also means a public or private 17structure or structures suitable primarily for use as a 18laboratory, laundry, nurses or interns residence or other 19housing or hotel facility used in whole or in part for staff, 20employees or students and their families, patients or 21relatives of patients admitted for treatment or care in a 22health facility, or persons conducting business with a health 23facility, physician's facility, surgicenter, administration 24building, research facility, maintenance, storage or utility 25facility and all structures or facilities related to any of 26the foregoing or required or useful for the operation of a   SB2306 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1health facility, including parking or other facilities or 2other supporting service structures required or useful for the 3orderly conduct of such health facility. "Health facility" 4also means, with respect to a project located outside the 5State, any public or private institution, place, building, or 6agency which provides services similar to those described 7above, provided that such project is owned, operated, leased 8or managed by a participating health institution located 9within the State, or a participating health institution 10affiliated with an entity located within the State.11    (k) The term "participating health institution" means (i) 12a private corporation or association or (ii) a public entity 13of this State, in either case authorized by the laws of this 14State or the applicable state to provide or operate a health 15facility as defined in this Act and which, pursuant to the 16provisions of this Act, undertakes the financing, construction 17or acquisition of a project or undertakes the refunding or 18refinancing of obligations, loans, indebtedness or advances as 19provided in this Act.20    (l) The term "health facility project", means a specific 21health facility work or improvement to be financed or 22refinanced (including without limitation through reimbursement 23of prior expenditures), acquired, constructed, enlarged, 24remodeled, renovated, improved, furnished, or equipped, with 25funds provided in whole or in part hereunder, any accounts 26receivable, working capital, liability or insurance cost or   SB2306 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1operating expense financing or refinancing program of a health 2facility with or involving funds provided in whole or in part 3hereunder, or any combination thereof.4    (m) The term "bond resolution" means the resolution or 5resolutions authorizing the issuance of, or providing terms 6and conditions related to, bonds issued under this Act and 7includes, where appropriate, any trust agreement, trust 8indenture, indenture of mortgage or deed of trust providing 9terms and conditions for such bonds.10    (n) The term "property" means any real, personal or mixed 11property, whether tangible or intangible, or any interest 12therein, including, without limitation, any real estate, 13leasehold interests, appurtenances, buildings, easements, 14equipment, furnishings, furniture, improvements, machinery, 15rights of way, structures, accounts, contract rights or any 16interest therein.17    (o) The term "revenues" means, with respect to any 18project, the rents, fees, charges, interest, principal 19repayments, collections and other income or profit derived 20therefrom.21    (p) The term "higher education project" means, in the case 22of a private institution of higher education, an educational 23facility to be acquired, constructed, enlarged, remodeled, 24renovated, improved, furnished, or equipped, or any 25combination thereof.26    (q) The term "cultural institution project" means, in the   SB2306 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1case of a cultural institution, a cultural facility to be 2acquired, constructed, enlarged, remodeled, renovated, 3improved, furnished, or equipped, or any combination thereof.4    (r) The term "educational facility" means any property 5located within the State, or any property located outside the 6State, provided that, if the property is located outside the 7State, it must be owned, operated, leased or managed by an 8entity located within the State or an entity affiliated with 9an entity located within the State, in each case constructed 10or acquired before or after the effective date of this Act, 11which is or will be, in whole or in part, suitable for the 12instruction, feeding, recreation or housing of students, the 13conducting of research or other work of a private institution 14of higher education, the use by a private institution of 15higher education in connection with any educational, research 16or related or incidental activities then being or to be 17conducted by it, or any combination of the foregoing, 18including, without limitation, any such property suitable for 19use as or in connection with any one or more of the following: 20an academic facility, administrative facility, agricultural 21facility, assembly hall, athletic facility, auditorium, 22boating facility, campus, communication facility, computer 23facility, continuing education facility, classroom, dining 24hall, dormitory, exhibition hall, fire fighting facility, fire 25prevention facility, food service and preparation facility, 26gymnasium, greenhouse, health care facility, hospital,   SB2306 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1housing, instructional facility, laboratory, library, 2maintenance facility, medical facility, museum, offices, 3parking area, physical education facility, recreational 4facility, research facility, stadium, storage facility, 5student union, study facility, theatre or utility.6    (s) The term "cultural facility" means any property 7located within the State, or any property located outside the 8State, provided that, if the property is located outside the 9State, it must be owned, operated, leased or managed by an 10entity located within the State or an entity affiliated with 11an entity located within the State, in each case constructed 12or acquired before or after the effective date of this Act, 13which is or will be, in whole or in part, suitable for the 14particular purposes or needs of a cultural institution, 15including, without limitation, any such property suitable for 16use as or in connection with any one or more of the following: 17an administrative facility, aquarium, assembly hall, 18auditorium, botanical garden, exhibition hall, gallery, 19greenhouse, library, museum, scientific laboratory, theater or 20zoological facility, and shall also include, without 21limitation, books, works of art or music, animal, plant or 22aquatic life or other items for display, exhibition or 23performance. The term "cultural facility" includes buildings 24on the National Register of Historic Places which are owned or 25operated by nonprofit entities.26    (t) "Private institution of higher education" means a   SB2306 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1not-for-profit educational institution which is not owned by 2the State or any political subdivision, agency, 3instrumentality, district or municipality thereof, which is 4authorized by law to provide a program of education beyond the 5high school level and which:6        (1) Admits as regular students only individuals having 7    a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the 8    recognized equivalent of such a certificate;9        (2) Provides an educational program for which it 10    awards a bachelor's degree, or provides an educational 11    program, admission into which is conditioned upon the 12    prior attainment of a bachelor's degree or its equivalent, 13    for which it awards a postgraduate degree, or provides not 14    less than a 2-year program which is acceptable for full 15    credit toward such a degree, or offers a 2-year program in 16    engineering, mathematics, or the physical or biological 17    sciences which is designed to prepare the student to work 18    as a technician and at a semiprofessional level in 19    engineering, scientific, or other technological fields 20    which require the understanding and application of basic 21    engineering, scientific, or mathematical principles or 22    knowledge;23        (3) Is accredited by a nationally recognized 24    accrediting agency or association or, if not so 25    accredited, is an institution whose credits are accepted, 26    on transfer, by not less than 3 institutions which are so   SB2306 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    accredited, for credit on the same basis as if transferred 2    from an institution so accredited, and holds an unrevoked 3    certificate of approval under the Private College Act from 4    the Board of Higher Education, or is qualified as a 5    "degree granting institution" under the Academic Degree 6    Act; and7        (4) Does not discriminate in the admission of students 8    on the basis of race or color. "Private institution of 9    higher education" also includes any "academic 10    institution".11    (u) The term "academic institution" means any 12not-for-profit institution which is not owned by the State or 13any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district 14or municipality thereof, which institution engages in, or 15facilitates academic, scientific, educational or professional 16research or learning in a field or fields of study taught at a 17private institution of higher education. Academic institutions 18include, without limitation, libraries, archives, academic, 19scientific, educational or professional societies, 20institutions, associations or foundations having such 21purposes.22    (v) The term "cultural institution" means any 23not-for-profit institution which is not owned by the State or 24any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district 25or municipality thereof, which institution engages in the 26cultural, intellectual, scientific, educational or artistic   SB2306 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1enrichment of the people of the State. Cultural institutions 2include, without limitation, aquaria, botanical societies, 3historical societies, libraries, museums, performing arts 4associations or societies, scientific societies and zoological 5societies. 6    (w) The term "affiliate" means, with respect to financing 7of an agricultural facility or an agribusiness, any lender, 8any person, firm or corporation controlled by, or under common 9control with, such lender, and any person, firm or corporation 10controlling such lender.11    (x) The term "agricultural facility" means land, any 12building or other improvement thereon or thereto, and any 13personal properties deemed necessary or suitable for use, 14whether or not now in existence, in farming, ranching, the 15production of agricultural commodities (including, without 16limitation, the products of aquaculture, hydroponics and 17silviculture) or the treating, processing or storing of such 18agricultural commodities when such activities are customarily 19engaged in by farmers as a part of farming and which land, 20building, improvement or personal property is located within 21the State, or is located outside the State, provided that, if 22such property is located outside the State, it must be owned, 23operated, leased, or managed by an entity located within the 24State or an entity affiliated with an entity located within 25the State.26    (y) The term "lender" with respect to financing of an   SB2306 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1agricultural facility or an agribusiness, means any federal or 2State chartered bank, Federal Land Bank, Production Credit 3Association, Bank for Cooperatives, federal or State chartered 4savings and loan association or building and loan association, 5Small Business Investment Company or any other institution 6qualified within this State to originate and service loans, 7including, but without limitation to, insurance companies, 8credit unions and mortgage loan companies. "Lender" also means 9a wholly owned subsidiary of a manufacturer, seller or 10distributor of goods or services that makes loans to 11businesses or individuals, commonly known as a "captive 12finance company".13    (z) The term "agribusiness" means any sole proprietorship, 14limited partnership, co-partnership, joint venture, 15corporation or cooperative which operates or will operate a 16facility located within the State or outside the State, 17provided that, if any facility is located outside the State, 18it must be owned, operated, leased, or managed by an entity 19located within the State or an entity affiliated with an 20entity located within the State, that is related to the 21processing of agricultural commodities (including, without 22limitation, the products of aquaculture, hydroponics and 23silviculture) or the manufacturing, production or construction 24of agricultural buildings, structures, equipment, implements, 25and supplies, or any other facilities or processes used in 26agricultural production. Agribusiness includes but is not   SB2306 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1limited to the following:2        (1) grain handling and processing, including grain 3    storage, drying, treatment, conditioning, mailing and 4    packaging;5        (2) seed and feed grain development and processing;6        (3) fruit and vegetable processing, including 7    preparation, canning and packaging;8        (4) processing of livestock and livestock products, 9    dairy products, poultry and poultry products, fish or 10    apiarian products, including slaughter, shearing, 11    collecting, preparation, canning and packaging;12        (5) fertilizer and agricultural chemical 13    manufacturing, processing, application and supplying;14        (6) farm machinery, equipment and implement 15    manufacturing and supplying;16        (7) manufacturing and supplying of agricultural 17    commodity processing machinery and equipment, including 18    machinery and equipment used in slaughter, treatment, 19    handling, collecting, preparation, canning or packaging of 20    agricultural commodities;21        (8) farm building and farm structure manufacturing, 22    construction and supplying;23        (9) construction, manufacturing, implementation, 24    supplying or servicing of irrigation, drainage and soil 25    and water conservation devices or equipment;26        (10) fuel processing and development facilities that   SB2306 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    produce fuel from agricultural commodities or byproducts;2        (11) facilities and equipment for processing and 3    packaging agricultural commodities specifically for 4    export;5        (12) facilities and equipment for forestry product 6    processing and supplying, including sawmilling operations, 7    wood chip operations, timber harvesting operations, and 8    manufacturing of prefabricated buildings, paper, furniture 9    or other goods from forestry products;10        (13) facilities and equipment for research and 11    development of products, processes and equipment for the 12    production, processing, preparation or packaging of 13    agricultural commodities and byproducts.14    (aa) The term "asset" with respect to financing of any 15agricultural facility or any agribusiness, means, but is not 16limited to the following: cash crops or feed on hand; 17livestock held for sale; breeding stock; marketable bonds and 18securities; securities not readily marketable; accounts 19receivable; notes receivable; cash invested in growing crops; 20net cash value of life insurance; machinery and equipment; 21cars and trucks; farm and other real estate including life 22estates and personal residence; value of beneficial interests 23in trusts; government payments or grants; and any other 24assets.25    (bb) The term "liability" with respect to financing of any 26agricultural facility or any agribusiness shall include, but   SB2306 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1not be limited to the following: accounts payable; notes or 2other indebtedness owed to any source; taxes; rent; amounts 3owed on real estate contracts or real estate mortgages; 4judgments; accrued interest payable; and any other liability.5    (cc) The term "Predecessor Authorities" means those 6authorities as described in Section 845-75.7    (dd) The term "housing project" means a specific work or 8improvement located within the State or outside the State and 9undertaken to provide residential dwelling accommodations, 10including the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation of 11lands, buildings and community facilities and in connection 12therewith to provide nonhousing facilities which are part of 13the housing project, including land, buildings, improvements, 14equipment and all ancillary facilities for use for offices, 15stores, retirement homes, hotels, financial institutions, 16service, health care, education, recreation or research 17establishments, or any other commercial purpose which are or 18are to be related to a housing development, provided that any 19work or improvement located outside the State is owned, 20operated, leased or managed by an entity located within the 21State, or any entity affiliated with an entity located within 22the State.23    (ee) The term "conservation project" means any project 24including the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, 25maintenance, operation, or upgrade that is intended to create 26or expand open space or to reduce energy usage through   SB2306 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1efficiency measures. For the purpose of this definition, "open 2space" has the definition set forth under Section 10 of the 3Illinois Open Land Trust Act. 4    (ff) The term "significant presence" means the existence 5within the State of the national or regional headquarters of 6an entity or group or such other facility of an entity or group 7of entities where a significant amount of the business 8functions are performed for such entity or group of entities. 9    (gg) The term "municipal bond issuer" means the State or 10any other state or commonwealth of the United States, or any 11unit of local government, school district, agency or 12instrumentality, office, department, division, bureau, 13commission, college or university thereof located in the State 14or any other state or commonwealth of the United States.15    (hh) The term "municipal bond program project" means a 16program for the funding of the purchase of bonds, notes or 17other obligations issued by or on behalf of a municipal bond 18issuer. 19    (ii) The term "participating lender" means any trust 20company, bank, savings bank, credit union, merchant bank, 21investment bank, broker, investment trust, pension fund, 22building and loan association, savings and loan association, 23insurance company, venture capital company, or other 24institution approved by the Authority which provides a portion 25of the financing for a project.26    (jj) The term "loan participation" means any loan in which   SB2306 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1the Authority co-operates with a participating lender to 2provide all or a portion of the financing for a project.3    (kk) The term "PACE Project" means an energy project as 4defined in Section 5 of the Property Assessed Clean Energy 5Act. 6    (ll) The term "clean energy" means energy generation that 7is substantially free (90% or more) of carbon dioxide 8emissions by design or operations, or that otherwise 9contributes to the reduction in emissions of environmentally 10hazardous materials or reduces the volume of environmentally 11dangerous materials.12    (mm) The term "clean energy project" means the 13acquisition, construction, refurbishment, creation, 14development or redevelopment of any facility, equipment, 15machinery, real property, or personal property for use by the 16State or any unit of local government, school district, agency 17or instrumentality, office, department, division, bureau, 18commission, college, or university of the State, for use by 19any person or institution, public or private, for profit or 20not for profit, or for use in any trade or business, which the 21Authority determines will aid, assist, or encourage the 22development or implementation of clean energy in the State, or 23as otherwise contemplated by Article 850.24    (nn) The term "Climate Bank" means the Authority in the 25exercise of those powers conferred on it by this Act related to 26clean energy or clean water, drinking water, or wastewater   SB2306 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1treatment.2    (oo) "Equity investment eligible community" and "eligible 3community" mean the geographic areas throughout Illinois that 4would most benefit from equitable investments by the State 5designed to combat discrimination. Specifically, the eligible 6communities shall be defined as the following areas:7        (1) R3 Areas as established pursuant to Section 10-40 8    of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, where residents 9    have historically been excluded from economic 10    opportunities, including opportunities in the energy 11    sector; and12        (2) Environmental justice communities, as defined by 13    the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 14    Agency Act, where residents have historically been subject 15    to disproportionate burdens of pollution, including 16    pollution from the energy sector.17    (pp) "Equity investment eligible person" and "eligible 18person" mean the persons who would most benefit from equitable 19investments by the State designed to combat discrimination. 20Specifically, eligible persons means the following people:21        (1) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 22    investment eligible community;23        (2) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled 24    in the foster care system; or25        (3) persons who were formerly incarcerated.26    (qq) "Environmental justice community" means the   SB2306 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1definition of that term based on existing methodologies and 2findings used and as may be updated by the Illinois Power 3Agency and its program administrator in the Illinois Solar for 4All Program. 5(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 6    (20 ILCS 3501/801-40)7    Sec. 801-40. In addition to the powers otherwise 8authorized by law and in addition to the foregoing general 9corporate powers, the Authority shall also have the following 10additional specific powers to be exercised in furtherance of 11the purposes of this Act.12    (a) The Authority shall have power (i) to accept grants, 13loans or appropriations from the federal government or the 14State, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or, in the 15case of clean energy projects, any not-for-profit 16philanthropic or other charitable organization, public or 17private, to be used for the operating expenses of the 18Authority, or for any purposes of the Authority, including the 19making of direct loans of such funds with respect to projects, 20and (ii) to enter into any agreement with the federal 21government or the State, or any agency or instrumentality 22thereof, in relationship to such grants, loans or 23appropriations.24    (b) The Authority shall have power to procure and enter 25into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnity   SB2306 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1agreements covering loss or damage to property from any cause, 2including loss of use and occupancy, or covering any other 3insurable risk.4    (c) The Authority shall have the continuing power to issue 5bonds for its corporate purposes. Bonds may be issued by the 6Authority in one or more series and may provide for the payment 7of any interest deemed necessary on such bonds, of the costs of 8issuance of such bonds, of any premium on any insurance, or of 9the cost of any guarantees, letters of credit or other similar 10documents, may provide for the funding of the reserves deemed 11necessary in connection with such bonds, and may provide for 12the refunding or advance refunding of any bonds or for 13accounts deemed necessary in connection with any purpose of 14the Authority. The bonds may bear interest payable at any time 15or times and at any rate or rates, notwithstanding any other 16provision of law to the contrary, and such rate or rates may be 17established by an index or formula which may be implemented or 18established by persons appointed or retained therefor by the 19Authority, or may bear no interest or may bear interest 20payable at maturity or upon redemption prior to maturity, may 21bear such date or dates, may be payable at such time or times 22and at such place or places, may mature at any time or times 23not later than 40 years from the date of issuance, may be sold 24at public or private sale at such time or times and at such 25price or prices, may be secured by such pledges, reserves, 26guarantees, letters of credit, insurance contracts or other   SB2306 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1similar credit support or liquidity instruments, may be 2executed in such manner, may be subject to redemption prior to 3maturity, may provide for the registration of the bonds, and 4may be subject to such other terms and conditions all as may be 5provided by the resolution or indenture authorizing the 6issuance of such bonds. The holder or holders of any bonds 7issued by the Authority may bring suits at law or proceedings 8in equity to compel the performance and observance by any 9person or by the Authority or any of its agents or employees of 10any contract or covenant made with the holders of such bonds 11and to compel such person or the Authority and any of its 12agents or employees to perform any duties required to be 13performed for the benefit of the holders of any such bonds by 14the provision of the resolution authorizing their issuance, 15and to enjoin such person or the Authority and any of its 16agents or employees from taking any action in conflict with 17any such contract or covenant. Notwithstanding the form and 18tenor of any such bonds and in the absence of any express 19recital on the face thereof that it is non-negotiable, all 20such bonds shall be negotiable instruments. Pending the 21preparation and execution of any such bonds, temporary bonds 22may be issued as provided by the resolution. The bonds shall be 23sold by the Authority in such manner as it shall determine. The 24bonds may be secured as provided in the authorizing resolution 25by the receipts, revenues, income and other available funds of 26the Authority and by any amounts derived by the Authority from   SB2306 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1the loan agreement or lease agreement with respect to the 2project or projects; and bonds may be issued as general 3obligations of the Authority payable from such revenues, funds 4and obligations of the Authority as the bond resolution shall 5provide, or may be issued as limited obligations with a claim 6for payment solely from such revenues, funds and obligations 7as the bond resolution shall provide. The Authority may grant 8a specific pledge or assignment of and lien on or security 9interest in such rights, revenues, income, or amounts and may 10grant a specific pledge or assignment of and lien on or 11security interest in any reserves, funds or accounts 12established in the resolution authorizing the issuance of 13bonds. Any such pledge, assignment, lien or security interest 14for the benefit of the holders of the Authority's bonds shall 15be valid and binding from the time the bonds are issued without 16any physical delivery or further act, and shall be valid and 17binding as against and prior to the claims of all other parties 18having claims against the Authority or any other person 19irrespective of whether the other parties have notice of the 20pledge, assignment, lien or security interest. As evidence of 21such pledge, assignment, lien and security interest, the 22Authority may execute and deliver a mortgage, trust agreement, 23indenture or security agreement or an assignment thereof. A 24remedy for any breach or default of the terms of any such 25agreement by the Authority may be by mandamus proceedings in 26any court of competent jurisdiction to compel the performance   SB2306 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1and compliance therewith, but the agreement may prescribe by 2whom or on whose behalf such action may be instituted. It is 3expressly understood that the Authority may, but need not, 4acquire title to any project with respect to which it 5exercises its authority.6    (d) With respect to the powers granted by this Act, the 7Authority may adopt rules and regulations prescribing the 8procedures by which persons may apply for assistance under 9this Act. Nothing herein shall be deemed to preclude the 10Authority, prior to the filing of any formal application, from 11conducting preliminary discussions and investigations with 12respect to the subject matter of any prospective application.13    (e) The Authority shall have power to acquire by purchase, 14lease, gift or otherwise any property or rights therein from 15any person useful for its purposes, whether improved for the 16purposes of any prospective project, or unimproved. The 17Authority may also accept any donation of funds for its 18purposes from any such source. The Authority shall have no 19independent power of condemnation but may acquire any property 20or rights therein obtained upon condemnation by any other 21authority, governmental entity or unit of local government 22with such power.23    (f) The Authority shall have power to develop, construct 24and improve either under its own direction, or through 25collaboration with any approved applicant, or to acquire 26through purchase or otherwise, any project, using for such   SB2306 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1purpose the proceeds derived from the sale of its bonds or from 2governmental loans or grants, and to hold title in the name of 3the Authority to such projects.4    (g) The Authority shall have power to lease pursuant to a 5lease agreement any project so developed and constructed or 6acquired to the approved tenant on such terms and conditions 7as may be appropriate to further the purposes of this Act and 8to maintain the credit of the Authority. Any such lease may 9provide for either the Authority or the approved tenant to 10assume initially, in whole or in part, the costs of 11maintenance, repair and improvements during the leasehold 12period. In no case, however, shall the total rentals from any 13project during any initial leasehold period or the total loan 14repayments to be made pursuant to any loan agreement, be less 15than an amount necessary to return over such lease or loan 16period (1) all costs incurred in connection with the 17development, construction, acquisition or improvement of the 18project and for repair, maintenance and improvements thereto 19during the period of the lease or loan; provided, however, 20that the rentals or loan repayments need not include costs met 21through the use of funds other than those obtained by the 22Authority through the issuance of its bonds or governmental 23loans; (2) a reasonable percentage additive to be agreed upon 24by the Authority and the borrower or tenant to cover a properly 25allocable portion of the Authority's general expenses, 26including, but not limited to, administrative expenses,   SB2306 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1salaries and general insurance, and (3) an amount sufficient 2to pay when due all principal of, interest and premium, if any 3on, any bonds issued by the Authority with respect to the 4project. The portion of total rentals payable under clause (3) 5of this subsection (g) shall be deposited in such special 6accounts, including all sinking funds, acquisition or 7construction funds, debt service and other funds as provided 8by any resolution, mortgage or trust agreement of the 9Authority pursuant to which any bond is issued.10    (h) The Authority has the power, upon the termination of 11any leasehold period of any project, to sell or lease for a 12further term or terms such project on such terms and 13conditions as the Authority shall deem reasonable and 14consistent with the purposes of the Act. The net proceeds from 15all such sales and the revenues or income from such leases 16shall be used to satisfy any indebtedness of the Authority 17with respect to such project and any balance may be used to pay 18any expenses of the Authority or be used for the further 19development, construction, acquisition or improvement of 20projects. In the event any project is vacated by a tenant prior 21to the termination of the initial leasehold period, the 22Authority shall sell or lease the facilities of the project on 23the most advantageous terms available. The net proceeds of any 24such disposition shall be treated in the same manner as the 25proceeds from sales or the revenues or income from leases 26subsequent to the termination of any initial leasehold period.  SB2306 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    (i) The Authority shall have the power to make loans, or to 2purchase loan participations in loans made, to persons to 3finance a project, to enter into loan agreements or agreements 4with participating lenders with respect thereto, and to accept 5guarantees from persons of its loans or the resultant 6evidences of obligations of the Authority.7    (j) The Authority may fix, determine, charge and collect 8any premiums, fees, charges, costs and expenses, including, 9without limitation, any application fees, commitment fees, 10program fees, financing charges or publication fees from any 11person in connection with its activities under this Act.12    (k) In addition to the funds established as provided 13herein, the Authority shall have the power to create and 14establish such reserve funds and accounts as may be necessary 15or desirable to accomplish its purposes under this Act and to 16deposit its available monies into the funds and accounts.17    (l) At the request of the governing body of any unit of 18local government, the Authority is authorized to market such 19local government's revenue bond offerings by preparing bond 20issues for sale, advertising for sealed bids, receiving bids 21at its offices, making the award to the bidder that offers the 22most favorable terms or arranging for negotiated placements or 23underwritings of such securities. The Authority may, at its 24discretion, offer for concurrent sale the revenue bonds of 25several local governments. Sales by the Authority of revenue 26bonds under this Section shall in no way imply State guarantee   SB2306 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1of such debt issue. The Authority may require such financial 2information from participating local governments as it deems 3necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this 4subsection (1).5    (m) The Authority may make grants to any county to which 6Division 5-37 of the Counties Code is applicable to assist in 7the financing of capital development, construction and 8renovation of new or existing facilities for hospitals and 9health care facilities under that Act. Such grants may only be 10made from funds appropriated for such purposes from the Build 11Illinois Bond Fund.12    (n) The Authority may establish an urban development 13action grant program for the purpose of assisting 14municipalities in Illinois which are experiencing severe 15economic distress to help stimulate economic development 16activities needed to aid in economic recovery. The Authority 17shall determine the types of activities and projects for which 18the urban development action grants may be used, provided that 19such projects and activities are broadly defined to include 20all reasonable projects and activities the primary objectives 21of which are the development of viable urban communities, 22including decent housing and a suitable living environment, 23and expansion of economic opportunity, principally for persons 24of low and moderate incomes. The Authority shall enter into 25grant agreements from monies appropriated for such purposes 26from the Build Illinois Bond Fund. The Authority shall monitor   SB2306 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1the use of the grants, and shall provide for audits of the 2funds as well as recovery by the Authority of any funds 3determined to have been spent in violation of this subsection 4(n) or any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder. The 5Authority shall provide technical assistance with regard to 6the effective use of the urban development action grants. The 7Authority shall file an annual report to the General Assembly 8concerning the progress of the grant program.9    (o) The Authority may establish a Housing Partnership 10Program whereby the Authority provides zero-interest loans to 11municipalities for the purpose of assisting in the financing 12of projects for the rehabilitation of affordable multi-family 13housing for low and moderate income residents. The Authority 14may provide such loans only upon a municipality's providing 15evidence that it has obtained private funding for the 16rehabilitation project. The Authority shall provide 3 State 17dollars for every 7 dollars obtained by the municipality from 18sources other than the State of Illinois. The loans shall be 19made from monies appropriated for such purpose from the Build 20Illinois Bond Fund. The total amount of loans available under 21the Housing Partnership Program shall not exceed $30,000,000. 22State loan monies under this subsection shall be used only for 23the acquisition and rehabilitation of existing buildings 24containing 4 or more dwelling units. The terms of any loan made 25by the municipality under this subsection shall require 26repayment of the loan to the municipality upon any sale or   SB2306 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1other transfer of the project. In addition, the Authority may 2use any moneys appropriated for such purpose from the Build 3Illinois Bond Fund, including funds loaned under this 4subsection and repaid as principal or interest, and investment 5income on such funds, to make the loans authorized by 6subsection (z), without regard to any restrictions or 7limitations provided in this subsection. 8    (p) The Authority may award grants to universities and 9research institutions, research consortiums and other 10not-for-profit entities for the purposes of: remodeling or 11otherwise physically altering existing laboratory or research 12facilities, expansion or physical additions to existing 13laboratory or research facilities, construction of new 14laboratory or research facilities or acquisition of modern 15equipment to support laboratory or research operations 16provided that such grants (i) be used solely in support of 17project and equipment acquisitions which enhance technology 18transfer, and (ii) not constitute more than 60 percent of the 19total project or acquisition cost.20    (q) Grants may be awarded by the Authority to units of 21local government for the purpose of developing the appropriate 22infrastructure or defraying other costs to the local 23government in support of laboratory or research facilities 24provided that such grants may not exceed 40% of the cost to the 25unit of local government.26    (r) In addition to the powers granted to the Authority   SB2306 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1under subsection (i), and in all cases supplemental to it, the 2Authority may establish a direct loan program to make loans 3to, or may purchase participations in loans made by 4participating lenders to, individuals, partnerships, 5corporations, or other business entities for the purpose of 6financing an industrial project, as defined in Section 801-10 7of this Act. For the purposes of such program and not by way of 8limitation on any other program of the Authority, including, 9without limitation, programs established under subsection (i), 10the Authority shall have the power to issue bonds, notes, or 11other evidences of indebtedness including commercial paper for 12purposes of providing a fund of capital from which it may make 13such loans. The Authority shall have the power to use any 14appropriations from the State made especially for the 15Authority's direct loan program, or moneys at any time held by 16the Authority under this Act outside the State treasury in the 17custody of either the Treasurer of the Authority or a trustee 18or depository appointed by the Authority, for additional 19capital to make such loans or purchase such loan 20participations, or for the purposes of reserve funds or 21pledged funds which secure the Authority's obligations of 22repayment of any bond, note or other form of indebtedness 23established for the purpose of providing capital for which it 24intends to make such loans or purchase such loan 25participations. For the purpose of obtaining such capital, the 26Authority may also enter into agreements with financial   SB2306 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1institutions, participating lenders, and other persons for the 2purpose of administering a loan participation program, selling 3loans or developing a secondary market for such loans or loan 4participations. Loans made under the direct loan program 5specifically established under this subsection (r), including 6loans under such program made by participating lenders in 7which the Authority purchases a participation, may be in an 8amount not to exceed $600,000 and shall be made for a portion 9of an industrial project which does not exceed 50% of the total 10project. No loan may be made by the Authority unless approved 11by the affirmative vote of at least 8 members of the board. The 12Authority shall establish procedures and publish rules which 13shall provide for the submission, review, and analysis of each 14direct loan and loan participation application and which shall 15preserve the ability of each board member and the Executive 16Director, as applicable, to reach an individual business 17judgment regarding the propriety of each direct loan or loan 18participation. The collective discretion of the board to 19approve or disapprove each loan shall be unencumbered. The 20Authority may establish and collect such fees and charges, 21determine and enforce such terms and conditions, and charge 22such interest rates as it determines to be necessary and 23appropriate to the successful administration of the direct 24loan program, including purchasing loan participations. The 25Authority may require such interests in collateral and such 26guarantees as it determines are necessary to protect the   SB2306 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1Authority's interest in the repayment of the principal and 2interest of each loan and loan participation made under the 3direct loan program. The restrictions established under this 4subsection (r) shall not be applicable to any loan or loan 5participation made under subsection (i) or to any loan or loan 6participation made under any other Section of this Act. 7    (s) The Authority may guarantee private loans to third 8parties up to a specified dollar amount in order to promote 9economic development in this State.10    (t) The Authority may adopt rules and regulations as may 11be necessary or advisable to implement the powers conferred by 12this Act.13    (u) The Authority shall have the power to issue bonds, 14notes or other evidences of indebtedness, which may be used to 15make loans to units of local government which are authorized 16to enter into loan agreements and other documents and to issue 17bonds, notes and other evidences of indebtedness for the 18purpose of financing the protection of storm sewer outfalls, 19the construction of adequate storm sewer outfalls, and the 20provision for flood protection of sanitary sewage treatment 21plans, in counties that have established a stormwater 22management planning committee in accordance with Section 235-1062 of the Counties Code. Any such loan shall be made by the 24Authority pursuant to the provisions of Section 820-5 to 25820-60 of this Act. The unit of local government shall pay back 26to the Authority the principal amount of the loan, plus annual   SB2306 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1interest as determined by the Authority. The Authority shall 2have the power, subject to appropriations by the General 3Assembly, to subsidize or buy down a portion of the interest on 4such loans, up to 4% per annum.5    (v) The Authority may accept security interests as 6provided in Sections 11-3 and 11-3.3 of the Illinois Public 7Aid Code.8    (w) Moral Obligation. In the event that the Authority 9determines that monies of the Authority will not be sufficient 10for the payment of the principal of and interest on its bonds 11during the next State fiscal year, the Chairperson, as soon as 12practicable, shall certify to the Governor the amount required 13by the Authority to enable it to pay such principal of and 14interest on the bonds. The Governor shall submit the amount so 15certified to the General Assembly as soon as practicable, but 16no later than the end of the current State fiscal year. This 17subsection shall apply only to any bonds or notes as to which 18the Authority shall have determined, in the resolution 19authorizing the issuance of the bonds or notes, that this 20subsection shall apply. Whenever the Authority makes such a 21determination, that fact shall be plainly stated on the face 22of the bonds or notes and that fact shall also be reported to 23the Governor. In the event of a withdrawal of moneys from a 24reserve fund established with respect to any issue or issues 25of bonds of the Authority to pay principal or interest on those 26bonds, the Chairperson of the Authority, as soon as   SB2306 Engrossed- 37 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1practicable, shall certify to the Governor the amount required 2to restore the reserve fund to the level required in the 3resolution or indenture securing those bonds. The Governor 4shall submit the amount so certified to the General Assembly 5as soon as practicable, but no later than the end of the 6current State fiscal year. The Authority shall obtain written 7approval from the Governor for any bonds and notes to be issued 8under this Section. In addition to any other bonds authorized 9to be issued under Sections 825-60, 825-65(e), 830-25 and 10845-5, the principal amount of Authority bonds outstanding 11issued under this Section 801-40(w) or under 20 ILCS 3850/1-80 12or 30 ILCS 360/2-6(c), which have been assumed by the 13Authority, shall not exceed $150,000,000. This subsection (w) 14shall in no way be applied to any bonds issued by the Authority 15on behalf of the Illinois Power Agency under Section 825-90 of 16this Act.17    (x) The Authority may enter into agreements or contracts 18with any person necessary or appropriate to place the payment 19obligations of the Authority under any of its bonds in whole or 20in part on any interest rate basis, cash flow basis, or other 21basis desired by the Authority, including without limitation 22agreements or contracts commonly known as "interest rate swap 23agreements", "forward payment conversion agreements", and 24"futures", or agreements or contracts to exchange cash flows 25or a series of payments, or agreements or contracts, including 26without limitation agreements or contracts commonly known as   SB2306 Engrossed- 38 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1"options", "puts", or "calls", to hedge payment, rate spread, 2or similar exposure; provided that any such agreement or 3contract shall not constitute an obligation for borrowed money 4and shall not be taken into account under Section 845-5 of this 5Act or any other debt limit of the Authority or the State of 6Illinois. 7    (y) The Authority shall publish summaries of projects and 8actions approved by the members of the Authority on its 9website. These summaries shall include, but not be limited to, 10information regarding the:11        (1) project;12        (2) Board's action or actions;13        (3) purpose of the project;14        (4) Authority's program and contribution;15        (5) volume cap;16        (6) jobs retained;17        (7) projected new jobs;18        (8) construction jobs created;19        (9) estimated sources and uses of funds;20        (10) financing summary;21        (11) project summary;22        (12) business summary;23        (13) ownership or economic disclosure statement;24        (14) professional and financial information;25        (15) service area; and26        (16) legislative district.  SB2306 Engrossed- 39 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    The disclosure of information pursuant to this subsection 2shall comply with the Freedom of Information Act. 3    (z) Consistent with the findings and declaration of policy 4set forth in item (j) of Section 801-5 of this Act, the 5Authority shall have the power to make loans to the Police 6Officers' Pension Investment Fund authorized by Section 722B-120 of the Illinois Pension Code and to make loans to the 8Firefighters' Pension Investment Fund authorized by Section 922C-120 of the Illinois Pension Code. Notwithstanding anything 10in this Act to the contrary, loans authorized by Section 1122B-120 and Section 22C-120 of the Illinois Pension Code may 12be made from any of the Authority's funds, including, but not 13limited to, funds in its Illinois Housing Partnership Program 14Fund, its Industrial Project Insurance Fund, or its Illinois 15Venture Investment Fund. 16    (aa) The Authority may finance or refinance (including, 17without limitation, through reimbursement of prior 18expenditures) any accounts receivable, working capital, 19liability, or insurance or noncapital cost or operating 20expense, or any combination thereof, for any unit of 21government, participating health institution, private 22institution of higher education, academic institution, 23cultural institution, or other person authorized to borrow 24funds from the Authority pursuant to this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.)   SB2306 Engrossed- 40 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    (20 ILCS 3501/850-10)2    Sec. 850-10. Powers and duties.3    (a) The Authority shall have the powers enumerated in this 4Act to assist in the development and implementation of clean 5energy in the State. The powers enumerated in this Article 6shall be in addition to all other powers of the Authority 7conferred in this Act, including those related to clean energy 8and the provision of clean water, drinking water, and 9wastewater treatment. The powers of the Authority to issue 10bonds, notes, and other obligations to finance loans 11administered by the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 12under the Public Water Supply Loan Program or the Water 13Pollution Control Loan Program or other similar programs shall 14not be limited or otherwise affected by this amendatory Act of 15the 102nd General Assembly.16    (b) In its role as the Climate Bank of the State, the 17Authority shall have the power to: (i) administer programs and 18funds appropriated by the General Assembly for clean energy 19projects in eligible communities and environmental justice 20communities or owned by eligible persons, (ii) support 21investment in the clean energy and clean water, drinking 22water, and wastewater treatment, (iii) support and otherwise 23promote investment in clean energy projects to foster the 24growth, development, and commercialization of clean energy 25projects and related enterprises, and (iv) stimulate demand 26for clean energy and the development of clean energy projects.  SB2306 Engrossed- 41 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    (c) In addition to, and not in limitation of, any other 2power of the Authority set forth in this Section or any other 3provisions of the general statutes, the Authority shall have 4and may exercise the following powers in furtherance of or in 5carrying out its clean energy powers and purposes:6        (1) To enter into joint ventures and invest in and 7    participate with any person, including, without 8    limitation, government entities and private corporations, 9    engaged primarily in the development of clean energy 10    projects, provided that members of the Authority or 11    officers may serve as directors, members, or officers of 12    any such business entity, and such service shall be deemed 13    to be in the discharge of the duties or within the scope of 14    the employment of any such member or officer, or Authority 15    or officers, as the case may be, so long as such member or 16    officer does not receive any compensation or direct or 17    indirect financial benefit as a result of serving in such 18    role.19        (2) To utilize funding sources, including, but not 20    limited to:21            (A) funds repurposed from existing programs 22        providing financing support for clean energy projects, 23        clean water projects, drinking water projects, 24        wastewater treatment projects, or climate resilience 25        projects, provided any transfer of funds from such 26        existing programs shall be subject to approval by the   SB2306 Engrossed- 42 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1        General Assembly and shall be used for expenses of 2        financing, grants, and loans;3            (B) any federal or other funds that can be used for 4        clean energy purposes, clean water projects, drinking 5        water projects, wastewater treatment projects, or 6        climate resilience projects;7            (C) charitable gifts, grants, and contributions as 8        well as loans from individuals, corporations, 9        university endowment funds, and philanthropic 10        foundations for clean energy projects or for the 11        provision of clean water, drinking water, and 12        wastewater treatment or climate resilience projects; 13        and14            (D) earnings and interest derived from financing 15        support activities for clean energy projects or 16        climate resilience projects financed by the Authority.17        (3) To enter into contracts with private sources to 18    raise capital.19    (d) The Authority may finance working capital, refinance 20outstanding indebtedness of any person, and otherwise assist 21in the investment of equity from any source, public or 22private, in connection with clean energy projects or any other 23projects authorized by this Act.24    (e) The Authority may assess reasonable fees on its 25financing activities to cover its reasonable costs and 26expenses, as determined by the Authority.  SB2306 Engrossed- 43 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    (f) The Authority shall make information regarding the 2rates, terms and conditions for all of its financing support 3transactions available to the public for inspection, including 4formal annual reviews by both a private auditor and the 5Comptroller, and providing details to the public on the 6Internet, provided public disclosure shall be restricted for 7patentable ideas, trade secrets, and proprietary or 8confidential commercial or financial information, disclosure 9of which may cause commercial harm to a nongovernmental 10recipient of such financing support and for other information 11exempt from public records disclosure pursuant to Section 121-210.13(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21.) 14    Section 10. The Climate Bank Loan Financing Act is amended 15by changing Sections 5, 10, and 35 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 445/5)17    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:18    "Alternate bonds", "applicable law", "bond", "general 19obligation bonds", "limited bonds", "governmental unit", 20"revenue bonds", "enterprise revenues", and "revenue source" 21have the respective meanings set forth in Section 3 of the 22Local Government Debt Reform Act.23    "Clean energy infrastructure project" means:24        (i) a project that uses renewable energy resources, as   SB2306 Engrossed- 44 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    defined in Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act;2        (ii) an energy efficiency project;3        (iii) a project that uses technology for the storage 4    of renewable energy, including, without limitation, the 5    use of battery or electrochemical storage technology for 6    mobile or stationary applications;7        (iv) a project for the acquisition or repairs of 8    electric vehicles;9        (v) a project for the acquisition, construction, or 10    repairs to electric vehicle charging stations; and11        (vi) a building electrification project of replacing 12    fossil fuels with electricity to meet a given end use. 13    "Climate resilience project" means a project to reduce 14hazards or risks to people and property from future disasters 15or climate-related conditions. "Climate resilience project" 16includes, but is not limited to, projects that ensure access 17to clean water and drinking water, support wastewater 18treatment or resiliency of other essential infrastructure and 19other projects that reduce the potential impact of disasters 20or climate change. 21    "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is exclusively 22powered by and refueled by electricity, must be plugged in to 23charge, and is licensed to drive on public roadways. 24    "Electric vehicle charging station" means a station that 25delivers electricity from a source outside an electric vehicle 26into one or more electric vehicles.   SB2306 Engrossed- 45 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1    "Energy efficiency project" means measures that reduce the 2amount of electricity, natural gas, or total Btu of 3electricity or natural gas required to achieve or meet a given 4end use, consistent with Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 5Agency Act.6    "Governing body" means the council, board, commission, or 7body, by whatever name it is known, having charge of the 8finances of a governmental unit.9(Source: P.A. 103-1023, eff. 8-9-24.) 10    (30 ILCS 445/10)11    Sec. 10. Clean energy infrastructure projects. A 12governmental unit may own, construct, equip, manage, control, 13erect, improve, extend, maintain, and operate new or existing 14clean energy infrastructure projects and climate resilience 15projects, may purchase real estate and any property rights to 16be used for clean energy infrastructure projects and climate 17resilience projects, and may charge for the use of clean 18energy infrastructure.19(Source: P.A. 103-1023, eff. 8-9-24.) 20    (30 ILCS 445/35)21    Sec. 35. Authority for issuance. The authority to issue 22bonds by a governmental unit under this Act and applicable law 23for clean energy infrastructure projects and climate 24resilience projects is in addition to any other authority to   SB2306 Engrossed- 46 -LRB104 08151 HLH 18199 b1issue bonds by a governmental unit provided by law.2(Source: P.A. 103-1023, eff. 8-9-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.